Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5792YH (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2731 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 216A.100 Percentage of income 1 payment plan program. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âArreared amountâ means an individualâs unpaid balance 5 with a utility company as noted by the department in subsection 6 5, paragraph âaâ , minus any amounts the department has 7 contributed toward the payment of the noted unpaid balance. 8 b. âPercentage of income payment plan programâ or âprogramâ 9 means the percentage of income payment plan program established 10 under this section. 11 c. âUtility companyâ means an owner or operator of an 12 electric or gas transmission or distribution facility subject 13 to regulation and enforcement by the Iowa utilities commission. 14 2. The department shall establish and administer a 15 percentage of income payment plan program. 16 3. The program shall be available to each individual who 17 qualifies for the low-income home energy assistance program. 18 An individual who is enrolled in the program shall not receive 19 benefits from the low-income home energy assistance program. 20 4. a. Each utility company shall cease collection of each 21 unpaid balance for an individual enrolled in the program until 22 the individual is discharged from the program. 23 b. Interest shall not accrue on unpaid balances subject to 24 this subsection. 25 c. Upon an individualâs discharge from the program, the 26 individualâs arreared amount, if any, shall become immediately 27 due. 28 5. Upon the departmentâs approval to enroll or reenroll an 29 individual in the program, all of the following shall occur: 30 a. The department shall note the unpaid balance the 31 individual has with each utility company. 32 b. (1) The department shall develop a payment plan for the 33 individual based on the individualâs annual gross income. 34 (2) The payment plan shall require the individual to pay a 35 -1- LSB 5792YH (3) 91 ak/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 2731 percentage of the individualâs gross monthly income toward the 1 individualâs electric and gas utility bills. The percentage an 2 individual pays for the individualâs electric and gas utility 3 bills shall not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars or 4 six percent of the individualâs gross monthly income, and 5 shall not be less than the lower of five dollars or two and 6 four-tenths percent of the individualâs gross monthly income. 7 6. When the department receives notice that each utility 8 company has received a monthly payment from an individual 9 pursuant to the individualâs payment plan, the following shall 10 occur: 11 a. The department shall pay the balance of the individualâs 12 electric and gas utility bills for the month for which the 13 individual made payment. 14 b. The department shall pay an amount equal to the amount 15 paid under the payment plan toward the individualâs arreared 16 amount. If the individual has unpaid balances with more than 17 one utility company, the payment shall be divided equally 18 between each utility company. 19 7. An individual shall be required to apply for reenrollment 20 in the program within one calendar year of the date the 21 department approves the individualâs reenrollment in the 22 program. 23 8. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 24 to administer this section, including but not limited to all 25 of the following: 26 a. Standards for when an individual shall be discharged from 27 the program. 28 b. Graduated scales for an individualâs monthly payments 29 based on the individualâs gross monthly income. 30